Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.160

Retirement for disability.

Any member who has at least ten years of creditable service within the fifteen years immediately preceding retirement and has not attained the age of sixty-five years, or who attains or has attained the age of sixty-five years prior to two years after the effective date, may be retired by the board for permanent and total disability, either ordinary or accidental not incurred in line of duty, and any member, regardless of his or her age or years of service, may be retired by the board for any permanent and total disability incurred in line of duty, upon examination as follows:

Any member while in service, or while physically or mentally incapacitated for the performance of duty, if such incapacity has been continuous from discontinuance of city service, shall be examined by such medical authority as the board shall employ, upon the application of the head of the office or department in which the member is employed with approval of the legislative body, or upon application of said member, or a person acting in his or her behalf, stating that said member is permanently and totally incapacitated, either physically or mentally, for the performance of duty and ought to be retired. If examination shows, to the satisfaction of the board, that the member should be retired, he or she shall be retired forthwith: PROVIDED, That no such application shall be considered or granted upon the application of a member unless said member or someone in his or her behalf, in case of the incapacity of a member, shall have filed the application within a period of one year from and after the discontinuance of service of said member: PROVIDED, The board shall retire the said member for disability forthwith: PROVIDED, That the disability retirement allowance shall be effective on the first of the month following that in which the member last received salary or wages in city service.

The board shall secure such medical services and advice as it may deem necessary to carry out the purpose of this section and RCW 41.44.180.

[ 2012 c 117 s 69; 1965 ex.s. c 99 s 6; 1951 c 275 s 12; 1949 c 171 s 6; 1947 c 71 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-145.]